dev/apertium-en-hi.hi.dix
<pardef n="/cAhiye_WA__tam">
	<e><p><l>yA_cAhiye_WA</l><r>yA_cAhiye_WA<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>yA_cAhiye_WA</l><r>yA_cAhiye_WA<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>yA_cAhiye_WA</l><r>yA_cAhiye_WA<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>yA_cAhiye_WA</l><r>yA_cAhiye_WA<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>yA_cAhiye_WA</l><r>yA_cAhiye_WA<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>yA_cAhiye_WA</l><r>yA_cAhiye_WA<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>yA_cAhiye_WA</l><r>yA_cAhiye_WA<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>yA_cAhiye_WA</l><r>yA_cAhiye_WA<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>yA_cAhiye_WA</l><r>yA_cAhiye_WA<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>yA_cAhiye_WA</l><r>yA_cAhiye_WA<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>yA_cAhiye_WA</l><r>yA_cAhiye_WA<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>yA_cAhiye_WA</l><r>yA_cAhiye_WA<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/gayA_hE__tam">
	<e><p><l>gayIM_hEM</l><r>yA_gayA_hE<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>gayIM_hEM</l><r>yA_gayA_hE<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>gayIM_hEM</l><r>yA_gayA_hE<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>gayI_hE</l><r>yA_gayA_hE<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>gayI_hE</l><r>yA_gayA_hE<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>gayI_hE</l><r>yA_gayA_hE<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>gaye_hEM</l><r>yA_gayA_hE<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>gaye_hEM</l><r>yA_gayA_hE<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>gaye_hEM</l><r>yA_gayA_hE<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>gayA_hE</l><r>yA_gayA_hE<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>gayA_hE</l><r>yA_gayA_hE<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>gayA_hE</l><r>yA_gayA_hE<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/gayA_hogA__tam">
	<e><p><l>gayIM_hoUzgA</l><r>yA_gayA_hogA<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>gayIM_hoUzgA</l><r>yA_gayA_hogA<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>gayIM_hoUzgA</l><r>yA_gayA_hogA<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>gayI_hoUzgA</l><r>yA_gayA_hogA<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>gayI_hoUzgA</l><r>yA_gayA_hogA<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>gayI_hoUzgA</l><r>yA_gayA_hogA<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>gaye_hoUzgA</l><r>yA_gayA_hogA<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>gaye_hoUzgA</l><r>yA_gayA_hogA<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>gaye_hoUzgA</l><r>yA_gayA_hogA<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>gayA_hoUzgA</l><r>yA_gayA_hogA<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>gayA_hoUzgA</l><r>yA_gayA_hogA<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>gayA_hoUzgA</l><r>yA_gayA_hogA<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/gayA__tam">
	<e><p><l>gayIM</l><r>yA_gayA<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>gayIM</l><r>yA_gayA<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>gayIM</l><r>yA_gayA<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>gayI</l><r>yA_gayA<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>gayI</l><r>yA_gayA<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>gayI</l><r>yA_gayA<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>gaye</l><r>yA_gayA<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>gaye</l><r>yA_gayA<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>gaye</l><r>yA_gayA<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>gayA</l><r>yA_gayA<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>gayA</l><r>yA_gayA<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>gayA</l><r>yA_gayA<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/gayA_WA__tam">
	<e><p><l>gayIM_WIM</l><r>yA_gayA_WA<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>gayIM_WIM</l><r>yA_gayA_WA<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>gayIM_WIM</l><r>yA_gayA_WA<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>gayI_WI</l><r>yA_gayA_WA<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>gayI_WI</l><r>yA_gayA_WA<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>gayI_WI</l><r>yA_gayA_WA<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>gaye_We</l><r>yA_gayA_WA<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>gaye_We</l><r>yA_gayA_WA<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>gaye_We</l><r>yA_gayA_WA<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>gayA_WA</l><r>yA_gayA_WA<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>gayA_WA</l><r>yA_gayA_WA<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>gayA_WA</l><r>yA_gayA_WA<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/hE__tam">
	<e><p><l>hEM</l><r>yA_hE<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ho</l><r>yA_hE<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>hEM</l><r>yA_hE<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>hE</l><r>yA_hE<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>hE</l><r>yA_hE<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>hUz</l><r>yA_hE<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>hEM</l><r>yA_hE<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ho</l><r>yA_hE<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>hEM</l><r>yA_hE<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>hE</l><r>yA_hE<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>hE</l><r>yA_hE<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>hUz</l><r>yA_hE<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/hI_jAnA_hE__tam">
	<e><p><l>yA_hI_jAnA_hE</l><r>yA_hI_jAnA_hE<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>yA_hI_jAnA_hE</l><r>yA_hI_jAnA_hE<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>yA_hI_jAnA_hE</l><r>yA_hI_jAnA_hE<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>yA_hI_jAnA_hE</l><r>yA_hI_jAnA_hE<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>yA_hI_jAnA_hE</l><r>yA_hI_jAnA_hE<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>yA_hI_jAnA_hE</l><r>yA_hI_jAnA_hE<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>yA_hI_jAnA_hE</l><r>yA_hI_jAnA_hE<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>yA_hI_jAnA_hE</l><r>yA_hI_jAnA_hE<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>yA_hI_jAnA_hE</l><r>yA_hI_jAnA_hE<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>yA_hI_jAnA_hE</l><r>yA_hI_jAnA_hE<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>yA_hI_jAnA_hE</l><r>yA_hI_jAnA_hE<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>yA_hI_jAnA_hE</l><r>yA_hI_jAnA_hE<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/hI_WA__tam">
	<e><p><l>yA_hI_WA</l><r>yA_hI_WA<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>yA_hI_WA</l><r>yA_hI_WA<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>yA_hI_WA</l><r>yA_hI_WA<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>yA_hI_WA</l><r>yA_hI_WA<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>yA_hI_WA</l><r>yA_hI_WA<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>yA_hI_WA</l><r>yA_hI_WA<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>yA_hI_WA</l><r>yA_hI_WA<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>yA_hI_WA</l><r>yA_hI_WA<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>yA_hI_WA</l><r>yA_hI_WA<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>yA_hI_WA</l><r>yA_hI_WA<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>yA_hI_WA</l><r>yA_hI_WA<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>yA_hI_WA</l><r>yA_hI_WA<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="nA_hI_WA"><i></i><par n="/hI_WA__tam"/></e>
<e lm="yA_gayA_hE"><i></i><par n="/gayA_hE__tam"/></e>
<e lm="yA_gayA_hogA"><i></i><par n="/gayA_hogA__tam"/></e>
<e lm="yA_gayA"><i></i><par n="/gayA__tam"/></e>
<e lm="yA_gayA_WA"><i></i><par n="/gayA_WA__tam"/></e>
<e lm="yA_hI_jAnA_hE"><i></i><par n="/hI_jAnA_hE__tam"/></e>
<e lm="yA_hI_WA"><i></i><par n="/hI_WA__tam"/></e>
